Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1656
Dam Safety Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Dam Safety Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist of fees credited pursuant to section 46-1655 and any money specifically appropriated to the fund by the Legislature. Money in the fund shall not be subject to any fiscal-year limitation or provision for lapse of unexpended balance at the end of any fiscal year or biennium. The fund shall be administered by the department. Money in the fund may be expended by the department for costs incurred by the department or the Chief Water Officer in the administration of the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 56;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 294.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.